Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
In General

§ 31-7-1.
Definitions.

The following terms are defined for the purposes of this chapter to have the following meanings:

“Agency” means any state board, commission, committee, council, university, department or unit thereof created by the Constitution or statutes if such board, commission, committee, council, university, department, unit or the head thereof is authorized to appoint subordinate staff by the Constitution or statute, except a legislative or judicial board, commission, committee, council, department or unit thereof; except a charter school authorized by the Mississippi Charter School Authorizer Board; and except the Mississippi State Port Authority; and except the Mississippi School of the Arts (MSA) established in Section 37-140-1 et seq. An academic medical center or health sciences school as defined in Section 37-115-50 is not an “agency” for those purchases of commodities as defined in this section that are used for clinical purposes and (i) intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease, and (ii) medical devices, biological, drugs and radiation emitting devices as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

“Governing authority” means boards of supervisors, governing boards of all school districts, all boards of directors of public water supply districts, boards of directors of master public water supply districts, municipal public utility commissions, governing authorities of all municipalities, port authorities, Mississippi State Port Authority, commissioners and boards of trustees of any public hospitals, boards of trustees of public library systems, district attorneys, school attendance officers and any political subdivision of the state supported wholly or in part by public funds of the state or political subdivisions thereof, including commissions, boards and agencies created or operated under the authority of any county or municipality of this state. The term “governing authority” shall not include economic development authorities supported in part by private funds, or commissions appointed to hold title to and oversee the development and management of lands and buildings which are donated by private individuals to the public for the use and benefit of the community and which are supported in part by private funds. The term “governing authority” also shall not include the governing board of a charter school. The term “governing authority” also shall not include the Mississippi School of the Arts established in Section 37-140-1 et seq.

“Purchasing agent” means any administrator, superintendent, purchase clerk or other chief officer so designated having general or special authority to negotiate for and make private contract for or purchase for any governing authority or agency, including issue purchase orders, invitations for bid, requests for proposals, and receive and accept bids.

“Public funds” means and includes any appropriated funds, special funds, fees or any other emoluments received by an agency or governing authority.

“Commodities” means and includes the various commodities, goods, merchandise, furniture, equipment, automotive equipment of every kind, and other personal property purchased by the agencies of the state and governing authorities, but not commodities purchased for resale or raw materials converted into products for resale.

“Equipment” shall be construed to include: automobiles, trucks, tractors, office appliances and all other equipment of every kind and description.

“Furniture” shall be construed to include: desks, chairs, tables, seats, filing cabinets, bookcases and all other items of a similar nature as well as dormitory furniture, appliances, carpets and all other items of personal property generally referred to as home, office or school furniture.

“Emergency” means any circumstances caused by fire, flood, explosion, storm, earthquake, epidemic, riot, insurrection or caused by any inherent defect due to defective construction, or when the immediate preservation of order or of public health is necessary by reason of unforeseen emergency, or when the immediate restoration of a condition of usefulness of any public building, equipment, road or bridge appears advisable, or in the case of a public utility when there is a failure of any machine or other thing used and useful in the generation, production or distribution of electricity, water or natural gas, or in the transportation or treatment of sewage; or when the delay incident to obtaining competitive bids could cause adverse impact upon the governing authorities or agency, its employees or its citizens; or in the case of a public airport, when the delay incident to publishing an advertisement for competitive bids would endanger public safety in a specific (not general) manner, result in or perpetuate a specific breach of airport security, or prevent the airport from providing specific air transportation services.

“Construction” means the process of building, altering, improving, renovating or demolishing a public structure, public building, or other public real property. It does not include routine operation, routine repair or regularly scheduled maintenance of existing public structures, public buildings or other public real property.

“Purchase” means buying, renting, leasing or otherwise acquiring.

“Certified purchasing office” means any purchasing office in which fifty percent (50%) or more of the purchasing agents hold a certification from the Universal Public Purchasing Certification Council or other nationally recognized purchasing certification, and in which, in the case of a state agency purchasing office, in addition to the national certification, one hundred percent (100%) of the purchasing officials hold a certification from the State of Mississippi’s Basic or Advanced Purchasing Certification Program.

“Certified Mississippi Purchasing Agent” means a state agency purchasing official who holds a certification from the Mississippi Basic Purchasing Certification Program as established by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management.

“Certified Mississippi Procurement Manager” means a state agency purchasing official who holds a certification from the Mississippi Advanced Purchasing Certification Program as established by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9024-01, 9024-10, 9024.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 480, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, §§ 1, 13; Laws, 1968, ch. 506, § 21; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 306, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 152; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 13; Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 22; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 63; Laws, 1990, ch. 585, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 404, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 335, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 539, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 362, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 497, § 35; Laws, 2016, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 367, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 398, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2019, ch. 432, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 31-7-3.
Administration of provisions of chapter; purposes.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall administer the provisions of this chapter.

The purposes or aims of the Department of Finance and Administration in carrying out said provisions shall be to coordinate and promote efficiency and economy in the purchase of commodities by the agencies of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9024-02, 9024-03; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, §§ 2, 3; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 153; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 14; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000).

§ 31-7-5.
Administrative rules and regulations.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall prescribe rules and regulations governing the manner in which the authority and duties granted to it by law may be carried out. It shall employ suitable and competent personnel, necessary to carry out its purposes. The Department of Finance and Administration may establish an Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management and employ a competent person as Director of the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management who shall be nonstate service and paid a salary as determined by the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the approval of the State Personnel Board.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-04; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 319, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 31-7-7.
Duties and powers.

Through its director and other supervisory personnel and, upon its request, through the agencies of the state, the Office of General Services shall supervise the performance of the following duties imposed upon it by this chapter:

A study of the purchases of commodities by the agencies of the state; the compilation, exchange and coordination of information concerning same; and the distribution of such information to the agencies and governing authorities requesting same.

The planning and coordination of purchases in volume for the agencies in order to take advantage of and secure the economies possible by volume purchasing; the arrangement of agreements between agencies and between governing authorities whereby one may make a purchase or purchases for the other or whereby an agency may make a purchase for a governing authority; the arrangement of agreements whereby purchases of commodities can be made between an agency and another agency or governing authority at a fair price, less depreciated value; the negotiations and execution of purchasing agreements and contracts through and under which the Office of General Services may require state agencies to purchase; and the obtaining or establishment of methods for obtaining of competitive bid prices upon which any agency of the state may purchase at the price approved by the Office of General Services.

The arrangement of provisions in purchase contracts of the state, or any agency, providing that the same price for which a commodity is available to an agency, may also, during the period of time provided therein, be available to any governing authority.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-05; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 5; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 3; Laws, 1983, ch. 330, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 154; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 31-7-9.
Purchasing regulations.

The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt purchasing regulations governing the purchase by any agency of any commodity or commodities and establishing standards and specifications for a commodity or commodities and the maximum fair prices of a commodity or commodities, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board. It shall have the power to amend, add to or eliminate purchasing regulations. The adoption of, amendment, addition to or elimination of purchasing regulations shall be based upon a determination by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management with the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, that such action is reasonable and practicable and advantageous to promote efficiency and economy in the purchase of commodities by the agencies of the state. Upon the adoption of any purchasing regulation, or an amendment, addition or elimination therein, copies of same shall be furnished to the State Auditor and to all agencies affected thereby. Thereafter, and except as otherwise may be provided in subsection (2) of this section, no agency of the state shall purchase any commodities covered by existing purchasing regulations unless such commodities be in conformity with the standards and specifications set forth in the purchasing regulations and unless the price thereof does not exceed the maximum fair price established by such purchasing regulations. The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall furnish to any county or municipality or other local public agency of the state requesting same, copies of purchasing regulations adopted by the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management and any amendments, changes or eliminations of same that may be made from time to time.

The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management may adopt purchasing regulations governing the use of credit cards, procurement cards and purchasing club membership cards to be used by state agencies, governing authorities of counties and municipalities, school districts and the Chickasawhay Natural Gas District. Use of the cards shall be in strict compliance with the regulations promulgated by the office. Any amounts due on the cards shall incur interest charges as set forth in Section 31-7-305 and shall not be considered debt.

Pursuant to the provision of Section 37-61-33(3), the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management of the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to issue procurement cards to all public school district classroom teachers and other necessary direct support personnel at the beginning of the school year for the purchase of instructional supplies using Educational Enhancement Funds. The cards will be issued in equal amounts per teacher determined by the total number of qualifying personnel and the then current state appropriation for classroom instructional supplies under the Education Enhancement Fund. All purchases shall be in accordance with state law and teachers are responsible for verification of capital asset requirements when pooling monies to purchase equipment. The cards will expire on a pre-determined date at the end of each school year. All unexpended amounts will be carried forward, to be combined with the following year’s instructional supply fund allocation, and reallocated for the following year. The Department of Finance and Administration is authorized to loan any start-up funds at the beginning of the school year to fund this procurement system for instructional supplies with loan repayment being made from sales tax receipts earmarked for the Education Enhancement Fund.

In a sale of goods or services, the seller shall not impose a surcharge on a buyer who uses a state-issued credit card, procurement card, travel card, or fuel card. The Department of Finance and Administration shall have exclusive jurisdiction to enforce and adopt rules relating to this paragraph. Any rules adopted under this paragraph shall be consistent with federal laws and regulations governing credit card transactions described by this paragraph. This paragraph does not create a cause of action against an individual for a violation of this paragraph.

The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, purchasing regulations governing the purchase of unmarked vehicles to be used by the Bureau of Narcotics and Department of Public Safety in official investigations pursuant to Section 25-1-87. Such regulations shall ensure that purchases of such vehicles shall be at a fair price and shall take into consideration the peculiar needs of the Bureau of Narcotics and Department of Public Safety in undercover operations.

The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall adopt, subject to the approval of the Public Procurement Review Board, regulations governing the certification process for certified purchasing offices, including the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, which shall be required of all purchasing agents at state agencies. Such regulations shall require entities desiring to be classified as certified purchasing offices to submit applications and applicable documents on an annual basis, and in the case of a state agency purchasing office, to have one hundred percent (100%) participation and completion by purchasing agents in the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, at which time the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management may provide the governing entity with a certification valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance. The Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management shall set a fee in an amount that recovers its costs to administer the Mississippi Purchasing Certification Program, which shall be assessed to the participating state agencies.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-06; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 155; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 16; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 71; Laws, 1989, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 5; Laws, 2002, ch. 316, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 539, § 4; Laws, 2004, ch. 562, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 7; Laws, 2012, ch. 543, § 4; Laws, 2013, ch. 362, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 330, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 31-7-10.
Lease-purchase program for state agency equipment; participation by local governments; Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund; funding of agency expenses; deposit of monies into State General Fund.

For the purposes of this section, the term “equipment” shall mean equipment, furniture, and if applicable, associated software and other applicable direct costs associated with the acquisition. In addition to its other powers and duties, the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to develop a master lease-purchase program and, pursuant to that program, shall have the authority to execute on behalf of the state master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by an agency, as provided in this section. Each agency electing to acquire equipment by a lease-purchase agreement shall participate in the Department of Finance and Administration’s master lease-purchase program, unless the Department of Finance and Administration makes a determination that such equipment cannot be obtained under the program or unless the equipment can be obtained elsewhere at an overall cost lower than that for which the equipment can be obtained under the program. Such lease-purchase agreements may include the refinancing or consolidation, or both, of any state agency lease-purchase agreements entered into after June 30, 1990.

All funds designated by agencies for procurement of equipment and financing thereof under the master lease-purchase program shall be paid into a special fund created in the State Treasury known as the “Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund,” which shall be used by the Department of Finance and Administration for payment to the lessors for equipment acquired under master lease-purchase agreements.

Upon final approval of an appropriation bill, each agency shall submit to the Public Procurement Review Board a schedule of proposed equipment acquisitions for the master lease-purchase program. Upon approval of an equipment schedule by the Public Procurement Review Board with the advice of the Department of Information Technology Services, the Office of Purchasing, Travel and Fleet Management, and the Division of Energy and Transportation of the Mississippi Development Authority as it pertains to energy efficient climate control systems, the Public Procurement Review Board shall forward a copy of the equipment schedule to the Department of Finance and Administration.

The level of lease-purchase debt recommended by the Department of Finance and Administration shall be subject to approval by the State Bond Commission. After such approval, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be authorized to advertise and solicit written competitive proposals for a lessor, who will purchase the equipment pursuant to bid awards made by the using agency under a given category and then transfer the equipment to the Department of Finance and Administration as lessee, pursuant to a master lease-purchase agreement.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall select the successful proposer for the financing of equipment under the master lease-purchase program with the approval of the State Bond Commission.

Each master lease-purchase agreement, and any subsequent amendments, shall include such terms and conditions as the State Bond Commission shall determine to be appropriate and in the public interest, and may include any covenants deemed necessary or desirable to protect the interests of the lessor, including, but not limited to, provisions setting forth the interest rate (or method for computing interest rates) for financing pursuant to such agreement, covenants concerning application of payments and funds held in the Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund, covenants to maintain casualty insurance with respect to equipment subject to the master lease-purchase agreement (and all state agencies are specifically authorized to purchase any insurance required by a master lease-purchase agreement) and covenants precluding or limiting the right of the lessee or user to acquire equipment within a specified time (not to exceed five (5) years) after cancellation on the basis of a failure to appropriate funds for payment of amounts due under a lease-purchase agreement covering comparable equipment. The State Bond Commission shall transmit copies of each such master lease-purchase agreement and each such amendment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. To the extent provided in any master lease-purchase agreement, title to equipment leased pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be vested in the state or the user of the equipment (as specified in such master lease-purchase agreement), subject to default under or termination of such master lease-purchase agreement.

A master lease-purchase agreement may provide for payment by the lessor to the lessee of the purchase price of the equipment to be acquired pursuant thereto prior to the date on which payment is due to the vendor for such equipment and that the lease payments by the lessee shall commence as though the equipment had been provided on the date of payment. If the lessee, or lessee’s escrow agent, has sufficient funds for payment of equipment purchases prior to payment due date to vendor of equipment, such funds shall be held or utilized on an as-needed basis for payment of equipment purchases either by the State Treasurer (in which event the master lease-purchase agreement may include provisions concerning the holding of such funds, the creation of a security interest for the benefit of the lessor in such funds until disbursed and other appropriate provisions approved by the Bond Commission) or by a corporate trustee selected by the Department of Finance and Administration (in which event the Department of Finance and Administration shall have the authority to enter into an agreement with such a corporate trustee containing terms and conditions approved by the Bond Commission). Earnings on any amount paid by the lessor prior to the acquisition of the equipment may be used to make lease payments under the master lease-purchase agreement or applied to pay costs and expenses incurred in connection with such lease-purchase agreement. In such event, the equipment-use agreements with the user agency may provide for lease payments to commence upon the date of payment by the lessor and may also provide for a credit against such payments to the extent that investment receipts from investment of the purchase price are to be used to make lease-purchase payments.

The annual rate of interest paid under any lease-purchase agreement authorized under this section shall not exceed the maximum interest rate to maturity on general obligation indebtedness permitted under Section 75-17-101.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall furnish the equipment to the various agencies, also known as the user, pursuant to an equipment-use agreement developed by the Department of Finance and Administration. Such agreements shall require that all monthly payments due from such agency be paid, transferred or allocated into the Master Lease-Purchase Program Fund pursuant to a schedule established by the Department of Finance and Administration. In the event such sums are not paid by the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue a requisition for a warrant to draw such amount as may be due from any funds appropriated for the use of the agency which has failed to make the payment as agreed.

All master lease-purchase agreements executed under the authority of this section shall contain the following annual allocation dependency clause or an annual allocation dependency clause which is substantially equivalent thereto: “The continuation of each equipment schedule to this agreement is contingent in whole or in part upon the appropriation of funds by the Legislature to make the lease-purchase payments required under such equipment schedule. If the Legislature fails to appropriate sufficient funds to provide for the continuation of the lease-purchase payments under any such equipment schedule, then the obligations of the lessee and of the agency to make such lease-purchase payments and the corresponding provisions of any such equipment schedule to this agreement shall terminate on the last day of the fiscal year for which appropriations were made.”

The maximum lease term for any equipment acquired under the master lease-purchase program shall not exceed the useful life of such equipment as determined according to the upper limit of the asset depreciation range (ADR) guidelines for the Class Life Asset Depreciation Range System established by the Internal Revenue Service pursuant to the United States Internal Revenue Code and Regulations thereunder as in effect on December 31, 1980, or comparable depreciation guidelines with respect to any equipment not covered by ADR guidelines. The Department of Finance and Administration shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this subsection if the term of a master lease-purchase agreement does not exceed the weighted average useful life of all equipment covered by such agreement and the schedules thereto as determined by the Department of Finance and Administration. For purposes of this subsection, the “term of a master lease-purchase agreement” shall be the weighted average maturity of all principal payments to be made under such master lease-purchase agreement and all schedules thereto.

Interest paid on any master lease-purchase agreement under this section shall be exempt from State of Mississippi income taxation. All equipment, and the purchase thereof by any lessor, acquired under the master lease-purchase program and all lease-purchase payments with respect thereto shall be exempt from all Mississippi sales, use and ad valorem taxes.

The Governor, in his annual executive budget to the Legislature, shall recommend appropriations sufficient to provide funds to pay all amounts due and payable during the applicable fiscal year under master lease-purchase agreements entered into pursuant to this section.

Any master lease-purchase agreement reciting in substance that such agreement has been entered into pursuant to this section shall be conclusively deemed to have been entered into in accordance with all of the provisions and conditions set forth in this section. Any defect or irregularity arising with respect to procedures applicable to the acquisition of any equipment shall not invalidate or otherwise limit the obligation of the Department of Finance and Administration, or the state or any agency of the state, under any master lease-purchase agreement or any equipment-use agreement.

There shall be maintained by the Department of Finance and Administration, with respect to each master lease-purchase agreement, an itemized statement of the cash price, interest rates, interest costs, commissions, debt service schedules and all other costs and expenses paid by the state incident to the lease-purchase of equipment under such agreement.

Lease-purchase agreements entered into by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning pursuant to the authority of Section 37-101-413 or by any other agency which has specific statutory authority other than pursuant to Section 31-7-13(e) to acquire equipment by lease-purchase shall not be made pursuant to the master lease-purchase program under this section, unless the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning or such other agency elects to participate as to part or all of its lease-purchase acquisitions in the master lease-purchase program pursuant to this section.

The Department of Finance and Administration may develop a master lease-purchase program for school districts and, pursuant to that program, may execute on behalf of the school districts master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by the school districts. The form and structure of this program shall be substantially the same as set forth in this section for the master lease-purchase program for state agencies. If sums due from a school district under the master lease-purchase program are not paid by the expiration of the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may withhold such amount that is due from the school district’s minimum education or adequate education program fund allotments.

The Department of Finance and Administration may develop a master lease-purchase program for community and junior college districts and, pursuant to that program, may execute on behalf of the community and junior college districts master lease-purchase agreements for equipment to be used by the community and junior college districts. The form and structure of this program must be substantially the same as set forth in this section for the master lease-purchase program for state agencies. If sums due from a community or junior college district under the master lease-purchase program are not paid by the expiration of the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration may withhold an amount equal to the amount due under the program from any funds allocated for that community or junior college district in the state appropriations for the use and support of the community and junior colleges.

From and after July 1, 2016, the expenses of this agency shall be defrayed by appropriation from the State General Fund and all user charges and fees authorized under this section shall be deposited into the State General Fund as authorized by law.

From and after July 1, 2016, no state agency shall charge another state agency a fee, assessment, rent or other charge for services or resources received by authority of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 545, § 1; Laws, 1990, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 51, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 424 § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 571 § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 566, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 6; Laws, 2002, ch. 409, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 537, § 8; Laws, 2016, ch. 459, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 31-7-11.
Purchasing practices.

Each agency of the state shall furnish information relative to its purchase of commodities, and as to its method of purchasing such commodities, to the Department of Finance and Administration annually and at such other times as the Department of Finance and Administration may request.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall have supervision over the purchasing and purchasing practices of each state agency and may by regulation or order correct any practice that appears contrary to the provisions of this chapter or to the best interests of the state. If it shall appear that any agency is not practicing economy in its purchasing or is permitting favoritism or any improper purchasing practice, the Department of Finance and Administration shall require that the agency immediately cease such improper activity, with full and complete authority in the Department of Finance and Administration to carry into effect its directions in such regard.

All purchases, trade-ins, sales or transfer of personal property made by any officer, board, agency, department or branch of the state government except the Legislature shall be subject to the approval of the Department of Finance and Administration. Such transaction shall be made in accordance with rules and regulations of the Department of Finance and Administration relating to the purchase of state-owned motor vehicles and all other personal property. The title of such property shall remain in the name of the state.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 9024-06, 9024-07; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, §§ 6, 7; Laws, 1970, ch. 353, § 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 156; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 17; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000).

§ 31-7-12.
State contract price for purchase of commodities.

Except in regard to purchases of unmarked vehicles made in accordance with purchasing regulations adopted by the Department of Finance and Administration pursuant to Section 31-7-9(2), all agencies shall purchase commodities at the state contract price from the approved source, unless approval is granted by the Department of Finance and Administration to solicit purchases outside the terms of the contracts. However, prices accepted by an agency shall be less than the prices set by the state contract. Prices accepted by an agency shall be obtained in compliance with paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of Section 31-7-13. It shall be the responsibility of the Department of Finance and Administration to ascertain that the resulting prices shall provide a cost effective alternative to the established state contract.

Governing authorities may purchase commodities approved by the Department of Finance and Administration from the state contract vendor, or from any source offering the identical commodity, at a price not exceeding the state contract price established by the Department of Finance and Administration for such commodity, without obtaining or advertising for competitive bids. Governing authorities that do not exercise the option to purchase such commodities from the state contract vendor or from another source offering the identical commodity at a price not exceeding the state contract price established by the Department of Finance and Administration shall make such purchases pursuant to the provisions of Section 31-7-13 without regard to state contract prices established by the Department of Finance and Administration, unless such purchases are authorized to be made under subsection (5) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit governing authorities from purchasing, pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, commodities approved by the Department of Finance and Administration at a price not exceeding the state contract price established by the Department of Finance and Administration.

The Department of Finance and Administration shall ensure that the prices of all commodities on the state contract are the lowest and best prices available from any source offering that commodity at the same level of quality or service, utilizing the reasonable standards established therefor by the Department of Finance and Administration. If the Department of Finance and Administration does not list an approved price for the particular item involved, purchase shall be made according to statutory bidding and licensing requirements. To encourage prudent purchasing practices, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be authorized and empowered to exempt certain commodities from the requirement that the lowest and best price be approved by order placed on its minutes.

Any school district may purchase commodities from vendors with which any levying authority of the school district, as defined in Section 37-57-1, has contracted through competitive bidding procedures pursuant to Section 31-7-13 for purchases of the same commodities. Purchases authorized by this subsection may be made by a school district without obtaining or advertising for competitive bids, and such purchases shall be made at the same prices and under the same conditions as purchases of the same commodities are to be made by the levying authority of the school district under the contract with the vendor.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 5; Laws, 1983, ch. 330, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 157; Laws, 1985, ch. 525, § 18; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 13; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 64; Laws, 1989, ch. 394, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 374, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 561, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 556, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved May 20, 2000).